District of Columbia statutes.
32-704

Domestic partnership benefits.

All health care facilities, including hospitals, convalescent facilities, or other long term care facilities, shall allow a patient’s family member as defined in § 32-701(7) to visit the patient.

June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-114, § 5, 39 DCR 2861
This section is referenced in § 32-702.
1981 Ed., § 36-1404.